North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116. Higher Education.
Article 4. University of North Carolina School of the Arts.

§ 116-63.
Policy.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of the State to foster, encourage and promote, and to provide assistance for, the cultural development of the citizens of North Carolina, and to this end the General Assembly does create and provide for a training center for instruction in the performing arts.

History.

1963, c. 1116.

§ 116-64.
Establishment of school.

There is hereby established, and there shall be maintained, a school for the professional training of students having exceptional talent in the performing arts which shall be defined as an educational institution of the State, to serve the students of North Carolina and other states, particularly other states of the South. The school shall be designated the “North Carolina School of the Arts, redesignated effective August 1, 2008, as the ‘University of North Carolina School of the Arts.’ ”

History.

1963, c. 1116; 1971, c. 1244, s. 13; 2008-192, s. 7.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2008-192, s. 7, effective August 1, 2008, inserted “redesignated effective August 1, 2008, as the ‘University of North Carolina School of the Arts,’ ” at the end of the paragraph.

§ 116-65.
To be part of University of North Carolina; membership of Board of Trustees.

The North Carolina School of Arts, redesignated effective August 1, 2008, as the “University of North Carolina School of the Arts,” is a part of the University of North Carolina and subject to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 116, of the General Statutes; provided, however, that notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 116-31

, the Board of Trustees of said school shall consist of 15 persons, 13 of whom are selected in accordance with provisions of

G.S. 116-31

, and the conductor of the North Carolina Symphony, or the conductor’s designee, and the Secretary of Natural and Cultural Resources, both serving ex officio and nonvoting.

History.

1963, c. 1116; 1971, c. 320, s. 4; c. 1244, s. 13; 1979, c. 562; 2003-215, s. 1; 2008-192, s. 8; 2015-241, s. 14.30(x).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(x), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Secretary of Natural and Cultural Resources” for “Secretary of the Department of Cultural Resources” near the end of the section.

§ 116-66.
Powers of various boards.

The Board of Governors of the University of North Carolina and the Board of Trustees of the school shall be advised and assisted by the State Board of Education. Entrance requirements shall be prescribed so that the professional training offered shall be available only to those students who possess exceptional talent in the performing arts. In developing curricula the school shall utilize, pursuant to agreement with institutions of higher education or with any local administrative school unit, existing facilities and such academic nonarts courses and programs of instruction as may be needed by the students of the school, and, in the discretion of the Board of Governors, personnel may be employed jointly with any such institution or unit on a cooperative, cost-sharing basis. Curricula below the collegiate level shall be developed with the advice and approval of the State Board of Education. The school shall confer and cooperate with the Southern Regional Education Board and with other regional and national organizations to obtain wide support and to establish the school as the center in the South for the professional training and performance of artists. The chancellor of the school shall preferably be a noted composer or dramatist.

History.

1963, c. 1116; 1971, c. 1244, s. 13; 1985, c. 101, s. 2.

§ 116-67.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1985, c. 101, s. 1.

§ 116-68.
Endowment fund.

The Board of Trustees is authorized to establish a permanent endowment fund, and shall perform such duties in relation thereto as are prescribed by the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 116, of the General Statutes. The proceeds in this fund are appropriated as provided by

G.S. 116-36

.

History.

1963, c. 1116; 1971, c. 1244, s. 13; 2006-203, s. 51.1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-203, s. 51.1, effective July 1, 2007, and applicable to the budget for the 2007-2009 biennium and each subsequent biennium thereafter, added the last sentence.

§ 116-68.1.
Fees.

The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina may set fees, not inconsistent with the actions of the General Assembly, to be paid by in-State high school students enrolled at the University of North Carolina School of the Arts to assist with expenses of the institution. The Board of Trustees may recommend to the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina that fees be set, not inconsistent with actions of the General Assembly, to be paid by in-State high school students enrolled at the University of North Carolina School of the Arts to assist with expenses of the institution. The University of North Carolina School of the Arts may charge and collect fees established as provided by this section from in-State high school students enrolled at the University of North Carolina School of the Arts.

History.

2013-360, s. 11.8(a).

§ 116-69.
Purpose of school program.

The primary purpose of the school shall be the professional training, as distinguished from liberal arts instruction, of talented students in the fields of music, drama, the dance, and allied performing arts, at both the high school and college levels of instruction, with emphasis placed upon performance of the arts, and not upon academic studies of the arts. The said school may also offer high school and college instruction in academic subjects, and such other programs as are deemed necessary to meet the needs of its students and of the State, consistent with appropriations made and gifts received therefor, and may cooperate, if it chooses, with other schools which provide such courses of instruction. The school, on occasion, may accept elementary grade students of rare talent, and shall arrange for such students, in cooperation with an elementary school, a suitable educational program.

History.

1963, c. 1116.

§ 116-69.1.
Display of the United States and North Carolina flags and the recitation of the Pledge of Allegiance.

The school shall (i) display the United States and North Carolina flags in each classroom when available, (ii) require the recitation of the Pledge of Allegiance on a daily basis, and (iii) provide instruction on the meaning and historical origins of the flag and the Pledge of Allegiance. The school shall not compel any person to stand, salute the flag, or recite the Pledge of Allegiance. If flags are donated or are otherwise available, flags shall be displayed in each classroom.

History.

2006-137, s. 3.

Cross References.

As to state salute to the North Carolina flag,

G.S. 144-8

.

§ 116-69.2.
Information about child abuse and neglect.

The school shall implement the rule addressing student awareness of child abuse and neglect, including sexual abuse, adopted by the State Board of Education under G.S. 115C-12(47).

History.

2021-132, s. 6(e).

§§ 116-70,
116-70.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 1244, s. 13.